California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
-------------------------------------------

538.

(a) Route 238 is from Route 680 in Fremont to Route 61 near San Lorenzo via Hayward.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 238 within the City of Hayward is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 238, the City of Hayward shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 238 or to the state highway system, as applicable.

(c) (1) The commission may relinquish to the City of Hayward all or any portion of Route 238 located within the city limits of that city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the
 state, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately after the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The portion of Route 238 relinquished shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 238 relinquished shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For relinquished portions of Route 238, the City of Hayward shall maintain signs
 within its jurisdiction directing motorists to the continuation of Route 238 or to the state highway system, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 16.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

539.

Route 239 is from Route 580 west of Tracy to Route 4 near Brentwood.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

541.

Route 241 is from Route 5 south of San Clemente to Route 91 in the City of Anaheim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 50.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

542.

Route 242 is from Route 680 to Route 4 north of Concord.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

543.

Route 243 is from Route 74 near Mountain Center to Route 10 near Banning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

544.

Route 244 is from Route 80 to Auburn Boulevard in Carmichael.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 46.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

545.

Route 245 is from Route 198 to Route 180 near the General Grant Grove section of Kings Canyon National Park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

546.

Route 246 is from:

(a) Current west city limits of the City of Lompoc to Route 1.

(b) Route 1 to Route 154 near Santa Ynez.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1258, Sec. 4.   Effective September 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

547.

Route 247 is from:

(a) Route 62 near Yucca Valley to Route 18 near Lucerne Valley.

(b) Route 18 near Lucerne Valley to Route 15 in Barstow.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 47.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

549.

Route 249 is from Route 2 north of La Canada to Route 14 south of Palmdale.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

Route 251 is from:

(a) Route 580 near Point San Quentin to Route 101 near Greenbrae.

(b) Route 101 near San Rafael to Route 1 near Point Reyes Station.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

Route 253 is from Route 128 near Boonville to Route 101 near Ukiah.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2155.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

Route 254 is the Avenue of the Giants, comprising a portion of the former Redwood Highway through and connecting a number of state park units, from Route 101 near the Sylvandale interchange to Route 101 south of Stafford.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 48.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

555.

Route 255 is from Route 101 in Eureka to Route 101 in Arcata via the Humboldt Bay Bridge and the Samoa Peninsula.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 49.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

557.

Route 257 is from Route 34 to Route 101 near Ventura.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------

558.

Route 258 is from Route 405 near Torrance to Route 101 near Hollywood.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------

559.

Route 259 is from Route 215 to Route 210 in San Bernardino.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

560.

(a) Route 260 is from Atlantic Avenue in Alameda to Route 880 in Oakland near Seventh and Harrison Streets.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 260 within the City of Alameda between Central Avenue and Atlantic Avenue is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For this relinquished former portion of Route 260, the City of Alameda shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 260.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 31.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

560.1.

Upon the completion of the additional subterranean tube between the Cities of Oakland and Alameda, in the vicinity of Webster Street, to be used in connection with the Posey Tube, both of which tubes are included in the description of Route 260, the department may by executive order, rule or regulation, designate both of said tubes, and the approaches leading to or from the nearest state highway or city street, as one-way highways, and thereafter restrict said tubes and approaches to one-way traffic, proceeding in opposite directions as to each other. Upon the placing of signs notifying the public of such restrictions, any person who willfully fails to observe such sign is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 361.1 by Stats. 1968, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

560.2.

Because of the statewide interest in navigation, the state will hold and save the United States of America free and harmless from liability for damages to the parallel tubes between the Cities of Oakland and Alameda included in the description of Route 260 due to the initial dredging work and subsequent maintenance dredging in an area within 50 feet of said tubes in connection with the deepening of the Oakland Estuary by the Corps of Engineers of the United States Army and the Director of Finance shall execute an agreement so to do with the proper representatives of the United States of America.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 361.2 by Stats. 1968, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

561.

Route 261 is from Walnut Avenue in the City of Irvine to Route 241.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 51.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

562.

Route 262 is from Route 880 to Route 680 near Warm Springs.

Route 262 shall cease to be a state highway when Route 237 is constructed between Route 880 and Route 680.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

563.

Route 263 is from Route 3 near the north city limits of Yreka northeasterly to Route 96 near the confluence of the Shasta and Klamath Rivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1354.)
-------------------------------------------

565.

Route 265 is from Route 97 in Weed northwesterly to Route 5 at North Weed Interchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1402.)
-------------------------------------------

566.

Route 266 is from the Nevada state line easterly of Oasis to the Nevada state line northerly of Oasis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 928, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

567.

Route 267 is from Route 80 near Truckee to Route 28 near Kings Beach, Lake Tahoe via Northshore Boulevard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1425.)
-------------------------------------------

569.

Route 269 is from Route 33 at Avenal to Route 145 near Five Points.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 748.)
-------------------------------------------

570.

Route 270 is from Route 395 south of Bridgeport to Bodie State Historic Park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

571.

Route 271 is from Route 101 near Cummings to Route 101 near the Humboldt-Mendocino county line.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

573.

Route 273 is from:

(a) Route 5 near Anderson to Route 299 in Redding.

(b) From Route 299 in Redding to Route 5 northeast of Redding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

575.

Route 275 is the Tower Bridge from the west side of the Sacramento River near the City of West Sacramento to the east side of the Sacramento River near the City of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 32.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

576.

Route 276 is from Route 198 near Three Rivers to Oak Grove.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1051.)
-------------------------------------------

580.

Route 280 is from Route 101 in San Jose to Route 80 near First Street in San Francisco via Daly City.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 89 of Chapter 1062 of the Statutes of 1959, construction of all or any portion of Route 280 from Route 101 near Alemany Boulevard to Route 480 near Harrison Street in San Francisco may be commenced at any time, if the City and County of San Francisco has conveyed or does convey to the State of California, without charge, all real property presently acquired by it for the construction of that portion of this route or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

580.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to subdivision (b), the department shall convey to the City and County of San Francisco, at no cost, the title to real property originally acquired by the department for the portion of Route 280 which was subsequently withdrawn from the Interstate System, which is jointly determined by the department and the City and County of San Francisco to be required for rights-of-way for the substitute transportation projects approved by the Federal Highway Administration.

(b) The department shall not convey title to that real property, unless the City and County of San Francisco agrees to assume full responsibility for any unsatisfied contractual and legal obligations incurred by the department when the department acquired the property.

(c) If the real property ceases to be used for one of the six substitute projects that were included in the I-280 Transfer Concept Program which was reported to the Federal Highway Administration on June 19, 1986, title to the real property shall revert to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 242, Sec. 4.   Effective July 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

581.

Route 281 is from Route 29 south of Lakeport to Route 29 southerly of Konocti Bay and via the vicinity of Soda Bay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

582.

Route 282 is from Route 75 to the Naval Air Station at North Island in Coronado.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1354.)
-------------------------------------------

583.

Route 283 is from Route 101 south of Rio Dell to the north end of the Eel River Bridge and Overhead in Rio Dell.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

584.

Route 284 is from Route 70 at Chilcoot to Frenchman Reservoir.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

599.

Route 299 is from:

(a) Route 101 near Arcata to Route 395 at Alturas.

(b) Route 395 near Alturas to the Nevada state line via Cedarville.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 828, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

603.

Route 330 is from Route 210 near Highland northeasterly to Route 18.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 630 by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

607.1.

Route 371 is from Route 79 near Aguanga to Route 74 east of Anza.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------

608.

Route 380 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Pacifica to Route 280 in San Bruno.

(b) Route 280 in San Bruno to Route 101 in the vicinity of the San Francisco International Airport.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

610.

Route 395 is from:

(a) Route 15 near Cajon Pass to the Nevada state line passing near Little Lake, Independence, Bridgeport, and Coleville.

(b) Nevada state line northwest of Reno to the Oregon state line near New Pine Creek via Alturas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 294.)
-------------------------------------------

615.

(a) Route 405 is from Route 5 near El Toro to Route 5 near San Fernando.

(b) (1) Route 405 from Bolsa Chica Road to Bolsa Avenue in the County of Orange shall be known and designated as the Little Saigon Freeway.

(2) The department shall determine the cost of appropriate signs, consistent with the signing requirements for the state highway system, showing special designation described
 in paragraph (1) and, upon receiving donations from nonstate sources sufficient to cover the cost, shall erect those signs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 574, Sec. 2.   (AB 2698)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

617.

Route 505 is from Route 80 near Vacaville to Route 5 near Dunnigan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

618.

Route 580 is from:

(a) Route 5 southwest of Vernalis to Route 80 in Oakland via the vicinity of Dublin and Hayward.

(b) Route 80 near Albany to Route 101 near San Rafael via the Richmond-San Rafael Bridge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

619.

Route 605 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Seal Beach to Route 405.

(b) Route 405 to Route 210 near Duarte.

Route 605 shall be known and designated as the “San Gabriel River Freeway.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 67.)
-------------------------------------------

620.

Route 680 is from:

(a) Route 101 near San Jose to Route 780 at Benicia passing near Warm Springs, Mission San Jose, Scotts Corners, and Sunol, and via Walnut Creek.

(b) Route 780 at Benicia to Route 80 near Cordelia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1354.)
-------------------------------------------

621.

Route 805 is from Route 5 near San Ysidro to Route 5 north of La Jolla and easterly of existing Route 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

622.

Route 710 is from Route 1 to Route 210 in Pasadena.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

622.1.

Route 710 shall also include that portion of the freeway between Route 1 and the northern end of Harbor Scenic Drive, that portion of Harbor Scenic Drive to Ocean Boulevard, that portion of Ocean Boulevard west of its intersection with Harbor Scenic Drive to its junction with Seaside Boulevard, and that portion of Seaside Boulevard from the junction with Ocean Boulevard to Route 47.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 16.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

622.3.

(a) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interest of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Pasadena the portion of Route 710 within the jurisdictional limits of that city, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(b) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all of the following shall
 occur:

(1) The relinquished portion of Route 710 shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The relinquished portion of Route 710 shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(3) The City of Pasadena shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 710.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 835, Sec. 7.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

623.

Route 780 is from Route 680 at Benicia to Route 80 in Vallejo.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1354.)
-------------------------------------------

624.

Route 980 is from Route 880 to Route 580 in Oakland.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 106, Sec. 30.   Effective May 13, 1988.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

625.

(a) Route 880 is from Route 280 in San Jose to Route 80 in Oakland.

(b) (1) The commission may relinquish to the City of Oakland the portion of the former right-of-way of Route 880 that is located between 8th Street and 32nd Street within that city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, including, but not limited to, a requirement that the department and the city enter into a cooperative agreement to improve, at the department’s expense, the two parallel adjacent city streets, including, but not limited to, sidewalks, landscaping, and street lighting, when improving the portion of right-of-way that is to be relinquished in accordance with plans to be developed by the department. The cooperative agreement shall include, but need not to be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A requirement that, if the commission allocates funds for this purpose, the improvements include bicycle paths and the associated roadway improvements and landscaping, including a bicycle path that closes the gap in the San Francisco Bay Trail Plan.

(B) A requirement that the improvements include removal of contaminated materials on the department’s property.

(C) A requirement that the improvements include erection of a memorial to the victims of the collapse of the Cypress Freeway Viaduct and to the heroism of those who responded to that disaster.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately following the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 538, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

632.

Route 905 is from:

(a) The International Boundary near Border Field northeasterly to Route 5.

(b) Route 5 near the south end of San Diego Bay to the International Boundary southerly of Brown Field.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 928, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

635.

(a) State Highway Route 1 from Las Cruces to San Francisco shall be known and designated as the “Cabrillo Highway.”

(b) State highway routes embracing portions of Routes 280, 82, 238, 101, 5, 72, 12, 37, 121, 87, 162, 185, 92, and 123 and connecting city streets and county roads thereto, and extending in a continuous route from Sonoma southerly to the international border and near the route historically known as El Camino Real shall be known and designated as “El Camino Real.”

(c) State Highway Route 1 from south of San Juan Capistrano to near El Rio shall be known and designated as the “Pacific Coast Highway.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. The Care and Protection of State Highways [660. - 759.3.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [660. - 661.]

660.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Highway” includes all, or any part, of the entire width of the right-of-way of a state highway, whether or not the entire area is actually used for highway purposes.

(b) “Encroachment” includes any tower, pole, pole line, pipe, pipe line, fence, billboard, stand or building, or any structure, object of any kind or character not particularly mentioned in this section, or special event, which is in, under, or over any portion of the highway. “Special event” means any street festival, sidewalk sale, community-sponsored activity, or community-approved activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   Effective July 23, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

661.

In addition to persons, public corporations, and districts specified in this chapter, this chapter shall apply to all private corporations authorized by law to establish or maintain any works or facilities in, under or over any public highway. This chapter shall not limit the powers and duties vested by law in the Public Utilities Commission of this State, and in the event of any conflict with regard to the powers and duties given the department in this chapter, those of the Public Utilities Commission shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Permit Provisions [670. - 695.]

670.

(a) The department may issue written permits, as provided in this chapter, authorizing the permittee to do any of the following acts:

(1) Make an opening or excavation for any purpose in any state highway.

(2) Place, change, or renew an encroachment.

(3) Place or display in, under, or over any state highway any advertising sign or device. Any advertising sign or device placed or displayed in violation of this section is a public nuisance and the department may immediately remove it. This section does not prohibit the posting of any notice in the manner required by law or by the order of any court.

(4) Plant, remove, cut, cut down, injure, or destroy any tree, shrub, plant, or flower growing within any state highway. However, the department shall not issue a permit for, or take any other action to accomplish, the destruction, removal, or topping of any tree, unless the tree is dead or diseased, for the purpose of improving or enhancing the view from the highway of an advertising sign or device or any commercial activity, unless, for any project whose cost is more than five hundred dollars ($500), the permittee has obtained consent from the city or county in which the tree is located. Nothing in this paragraph limits the department’s authority to modify or deny any permittee’s request. If the city or county does not respond within 30 days to a request for a permit pursuant to this paragraph, the city or county is deemed to have given consent to the project.

(5) Install or remove tire chains upon motor vehicles for compensation on any state highway at locations designated in the permit, upon any terms and conditions relating to the safe and orderly movement of traffic that the department finds necessary. The department may issue sufficient permits for the installation or removal of tire chains that it finds necessary or desirable to accommodate the demand for those services consistent with the maximum convenience and safety to traffic. The department, in issuing any permit for the installation or removal of tire chains, shall assume no responsibility for the competence or reliability of the permittee in performing those services.

(b) Any person who does any act specified in this section without a permit is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

670.1.

(a) The department may issue a permit to the owner or developer of property adjacent to or near a state highway to construct, alter, repair, or improve any portion of the highway for the purpose of improving local traffic access, if the improvements to the highway are required as part of, or as a condition to, the development of property and the improvements are accepted by the department.

(b) The permit may be issued only if the work within the highway right-of-way is to be performed in accordance with plans and specifications approved by the department and the department reserves the right to inspect and accept the work as complying with the approved plans and specifications.

(c) All road, bridge, street lighting, or installation of signal work performed under a permit issued pursuant to this section for acceptance into the state highway system, except work performed solely to allow private encroachments onto the state highway or for utility or drainage encroachments within the state highway, are public works for purposes of Part 7 (commencing with Section 1720) of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1106, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

670.5.

(a) The Flag of the United States of America and the Flag of the State of California may be displayed on a sidewalk located in or abutting on a state highway situated within a city, if the type of flagholder and the method of its installation and maintenance are not in violation of the department’s rules.

(b) (1) A city or county may display the Flag of the United States of America or the Flag of the State of California, or both, as part of a gateway monument if the flags are maintained by the city or county.

(2) As used in this subdivision, a “gateway monument” means any
 freestanding structure or sign, or nonintegral or nonrequired highway feature, constructed within the state’s right-of-way, that communicates the name of the city or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   (AB 866)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

671.

Any act done under the authority of a written permit, issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be done in accordance with the applicable provisions of this chapter, and the terms and conditions of such permit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

671.1.

The department may establish a fee schedule and charge a fee for the issuance of permits pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except that no such fee shall be charged by the department to any public corporation. The fee schedule established by the department shall not produce a total estimated revenue in excess of the estimated total cost to the department for administering the provisions of this chapter, excluding the cost of issuing permits exempted by statute or regulation from the payment of fees. Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

671.5.

(a) The department shall either approve or deny an application from an applicant for an encroachment permit within 60 days of receiving a completed application, as determined by the department. An application for an encroachment permit is complete when all other statutory requirements, including the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), have been complied with. The department’s failure to notify the applicant within that 60-day period that the permit is denied shall be deemed to constitute approval of the permit. Thereafter, upon notifying the department, the applicant may act in accordance with its permit application, as if the permit had been approved.

(b) All of the following shall apply to the department’s review of an application for an encroachment permit for a broadband facility:

(1) The department shall specify in writing all permit application criteria. It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure a streamlined, predictable, and expeditious process by which the department reviews broadband facility permit applications in order to achieve the rapid deployment of broadband facilities on highways.

(2) Within 30 days after an application for an encroachment permit for a broadband facility is submitted, the department shall notify the applicant in writing whether the permit application is deemed complete. If the department does not notify the applicant within
 that 30-day period that the application is incomplete, the failure to notify shall be deemed to constitute a finding that the permit application is complete.

(3) If the department deems a permit application incomplete, the department shall do all of the following:

(A) At the time of notifying the applicant that the application is incomplete, furnish to the applicant a detailed explanation why the application is incomplete, with reference to the specific application criteria that the application does not meet.

(B) Identify all supplemental information necessary to complete the application.

(C) In a timely manner and no later than 14 days after a meeting is
 requested by the applicant, meet with the applicant to discuss any outstanding supplemental information necessary to complete the application. The department shall not be required to participate in more than three individual meetings with the applicant and shall not be required to meet in excess of four hours for each permit application.

(D) Provide the applicant with no less than 30 days to resubmit its application with the supplemental information that the department identified in the notice. The applicant’s failure to respond with additional information during that period shall be deemed to constitute a withdrawal of the application.

(4) Within 30 days after receiving supplemental information from an applicant pursuant to paragraph (3), the department shall approve or deny
 the application.

(c) If the department denies an application for an encroachment permit, the department shall, at the time of notifying the applicant of the denial, furnish to the applicant a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial.

(d) The department shall adopt regulations prescribing procedures for an applicant to appeal to the director for a final determination of the department’s denial of an application. The appeal shall be made in writing to the director. There shall be a final written determination by the director within 60 calendar days after receipt of the applicant’s written appeal. The adopted regulations shall require the appellant to pay to the department a fee of not more than 50 percent of the estimated administrative cost to the department of
 conducting the appeal.

(e) This section does not preclude an applicant and the department from mutually agreeing to an extension of any time limit provided by this section.

(f) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall develop and adopt a process for project intake, project evaluation, and encroachment permit review for complete streets facilities, including pedestrian, bicycle, and transit priority facilities, that are sponsored by a local jurisdiction or a transit agency. The department shall design this process to enable the department to comply with subdivision (a).

(2) The department shall report annually to the commission regarding project applications submitted pursuant to the
 process adopted pursuant to paragraph (1). The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(A) The number of completed applications submitted.

(B) The number of encroachment permits issued.

(C) The number of days required to process each application.

(3) The department shall post the report described in paragraph (2) on the department’s internet website.

(4) The department shall designate an encroachment permit manager in each district to ensure that applications for complete streets facilities are reviewed through the process adopted pursuant to paragraph (1). The
 encroachment permit manager shall have expertise in bicycle, pedestrian, and transit priority facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 630, Sec. 7.   (SB 960)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

672.

Any permit issued under the provisions of this chapter may provide that the permittee will pay the entire expense of replacing the highway in as good condition as before, and may provide such other conditions as to the location and the manner in which the work is to be done as the department finds necessary for the protection of the highway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

673.

(a) Any permit issued to a permittee of the class specified in Section 678 shall contain a provision that in the event the future improvement of the highway necessitates the relocation or removal of the encroachment the permittee will relocate or remove the same at the permittee’s sole expense. In that event, the department shall serve on the permittee its written demand specifying the place of relocation, or that the encroachment is to be removed from the highway, and specifying a reasonable time within which the work of relocation is to be commenced. The permittee shall commence the relocation or removal within the time specified in that demand and thereafter diligently prosecute until completion.

(b) All permits, other than those issued to permittees of the class specified in Section 678 or the class specified in Section 680, are revocable on five days’ notice and the encroachment shall be removed or relocated as may be specified by the department in the notice revoking the permit and within the time specified by the department, which time shall not be less than five days, unless the permit so provides.

(c) The department may waive the requirement of subdivision (a) that the permittee bear the sole expense of relocating or removing an encroachment, if the encroachment consists of a track or roadway that serves as an exclusive public mass transit guideway owned, operated, and maintained by a publicly owned mass transit authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 152, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

674.

The department may, but is not required to, supervise any work done under any permit, issued under the provisions of this chapter in which event the permittee shall, in addition to any fees charged pursuant to Section 671.1, pay the reasonable cost of such supervision to the department, but no cost of supervision shall be charged by the department to any public corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

675.

(a) Permittees may excavate openings in state highways to make repairs in cases of emergency requiring immediate action. In such cases, the appropriate representative of the department shall be promptly notified of any such action, and such permittee, at his own expense, shall immediately replace the state highway in as good condition as before such excavation.

(b) A city or public corporation supplying water service to its inhabitants may, within its corporate limits, excavate a state highway without a permit in cases of emergency requiring immediate action. In such cases, the state highway shall, at the expense of the city or public corporation, be replaced in as good condition as before such excavation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

The department may delegate to any city any of the department’s powers, duties, and authority, other than those of approval, under this chapter as to any State highway, or any part thereof, within such city, and may withdraw any such delegation of authority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

677.

Before granting a permit under any provision of this chapter, the department may require the applicant to file with the department a satisfactory bond payable to the people of the State of California in such amount as the department deems sufficient, conditioned on the proper compliance by the permittee with the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

678.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, such a bond shall not be required of any county, city, public corporation or political subdivision which is authorized by law to establish or maintain any works or facilities in, under or over any public highway, nor shall the application of any such governmental unit for a permit be denied. Every such applicant is entitled as a matter of right to a permit, but is otherwise subject to the provisions of this article and to all reasonable conditions and provisions made by the department in any such permit.

The department may require of any such applicant a bond in a sum not to exceed twenty thousand dollars, if such applicant has in fact prior to such application failed to comply with the provisions of this article or with the provisions of a previous permit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

679.

Any city, municipal utility district, municipal water district or metropolitan water district is entitled to a blanket permit, renewable annually, for the installation of its service connections and for ordinary maintenance of its facilities located or installed in State highways; but the department may revoke any such blanket permit if the permittee fails to comply with the provisions of this article. When any such permit is revoked in a proper case such municipal utility district, municipal water district or metropolitan water district is entitled to a permit only on furnishing a bond as provided in section 677.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

680.

Whenever a franchise is granted by any county or city in any public highway which has been or is subsequently constituted a state highway, the department may enforce any obligations of the grantee or holder of the franchise with respect to the repair of the highway. The department may require any person who has placed and maintained any pole, pole line, pipe, pipeline, conduit, street railroad tracks, or other structures or facilities upon any state highway, whether under that or any franchise, to move it at his or her own cost and expense to such different location in the highway as is specified in a written demand of the department, whenever necessary to insure the safety of the traveling public or to permit the improvement of the highway. However, no such change of location shall be required for a temporary purpose. The department shall specify in the demand a reasonable time within which the work of relocation shall be commenced and the grantee or owner shall commence the relocation within the time specified in the demand and thereafter diligently prosecute it to completion.
